Utah statutes.
32A-1-110.   Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control -- Created --
Organization.
(1)  There is created a Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control governed by
the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission.
(2)  The department shall be administered by the director of alcoholic
beverage control.
(3)  The allocation of duties and responsibilities within the department shall
be organized into divisions, bureaus, sections, offices, and committees as the
director considers necessary for the administration of this title.
(4)  The department shall cooperate with any other recognized agency in the
administration of this title and in the enforcement of policies, directives,
and rules of the commission and the director.
